Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.330

Construction, reconstruction, equipping, and demolition of community and technical college facilities and acquisition of property—Revenue bond financing—Public bid.

(1) The boards of trustees of college districts are empowered in accordance with the provisions of this chapter to provide for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, demolition, and major alterations of buildings and other capital assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements, or appurtenances for the use of the aforementioned colleges as authorized by the college board in accordance with RCW 28B.50.140; to be financed by bonds payable out of special funds from revenues hereafter derived from income received from such facilities, gifts, bequests, or grants, and such additional funds as the legislature may provide, and payable out of a bond retirement fund to be established by the respective district boards in accordance with rules of the state board. With respect to building, improvements, or repairs, or other work, where the estimated cost exceeds $110,000, or $90,000 if the work involves one trade or craft area, complete plans and specifications for the work shall be prepared, the work shall be put out for a public bid, and the contract shall be awarded to the responsible bidder who submits the lowest responsive bid. Any project regardless of dollar amount may be put to public bid.

(2) This section does not apply when a contract is awarded by the small works roster procedure authorized in RCW 39.04.151 through 39.04.154.

(3) Where the estimated cost to any college of any building, improvements, or repairs, or other work, is less than $110,000, or $90,000 if the work involves one trade or craft area, the publication requirements of RCW 39.04.020 do not apply.

[ 2023 c 395 s 19; 2023 c 97 s 2; 2009 c 229 s 1; 2007 c 495 s 2; 1993 c 379 s 108; 1991 c 238 s 48; 1979 ex.s. c 12 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.330. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 33. Formerly RCW 28.85.330.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2023 c 97 s 2 and by 2023 c 395 s 19, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2023 c 395 ss 1-30, 32-34, 36, and 37: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Findings—Intent—2023 c 395: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1993 c 379: See notes following RCW 28B.10.029.

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 12: See note following RCW 28B.10.350.